Alaska statutes. Title 14. Education, Libraries, and Museums.
Article 3. Correspondence Study Programs.

Effective dates. —

Section 62, ch. 15, SLA 2014 makes this article effective July 1, 2014.

Sec. 14.03.300.
Correspondence study programs; individual learning plans.

A district or the department that provides a correspondence study program shall annually provide an individual learning plan for each student enrolled in the program developed in collaboration with the student, the parent or guardian of the student, a certificated teacher assigned to the student, and other individuals involved in the student’s learning plan. An individual learning plan must

be developed with the assistance and approval of the certificated teacher assigned to the student by the district;

provide for a course of study for the appropriate grade level consistent with state and district standards;

provide for an ongoing assessment plan that includes statewide assessments required for public schools under AS

14.03.123(f)

;

include a provision for modification of the individual learning plan if the student is below proficient on a standardized assessment in a core subject;

provide for a signed agreement between the certificated teacher assigned to the student and at least one parent or the guardian of each student that verifies compliance with an individual learning plan;

provide for monitoring of each student’s work and progress by the certificated teacher assigned to the student.

Notwithstanding another provision of law, the department may not impose additional requirements, other than the requirements specified under (a) of this section and under AS

14.03.310

, on a student who is proficient or advanced on statewide assessments required under AS

14.03.123(f)

.

History.

(§ 15 ch 15 SLA 2014)

Sec. 14.03.310.
Student allotments.

Except as provided in (e) of this section, the department or a district that provides a correspondence study program may provide an annual student allotment to a parent or guardian of a student enrolled in the correspondence study program for the purpose of meeting instructional expenses for the student enrolled in the program as provided in this section.

A parent or guardian may purchase nonsectarian services and materials from a public, private, or religious organization with a student allotment provided under (a) of this section if

the services and materials are required for the course of study in the individual learning plan developed for the student under AS

14.03.300

;

textbooks, services, and other curriculum materials and the course of study

are approved by the school district;

are appropriate for the student;

are aligned to state standards; and

comply with AS

14.03.090

and AS

14.18.060

; and

the services and materials otherwise support a public purpose.

Except as provided in (d) of this section, an annual student allotment provided under this section is reserved and excluded from the unreserved portion of a district’s year-end fund balance in the school operating fund under AS

14.17.505

.

The department or a district that provides for an annual student allotment under (a) of this section shall

account for the balance of an unexpended annual student allotment during the period in which a student continues to be enrolled in the correspondence program for which the annual allotment was provided;

return the unexpended balance of a student allotment to the budget of the department or district for a student who is no longer enrolled in the correspondence program for which the allotment was provided;

maintain a record of expenditures and allotments; and

implement a routine monitoring of audits and expenditures.

A student allotment provided under (a) of this section may not be used to pay for services provided to a student by a family member. In this subsection, “family member” means the student’s spouse, guardian, parent, stepparent, sibling, stepsibling, grandparent, stepgrandparent, child, uncle, or aunt.

History.

(§ 15 ch 15 SLA 2014)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS 14.03.320.
Renumbered in 2014.